Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A public university listed  in ORS 352.002 shall report annually to the
Attorney General on the university’s use of outside  counsel for legal matters. The report
must include:
(a) The types of matters handled by outside counsel;
(b) The number of litigation matters handled by outside counsel; and
(c) The total amount spent on outside counsel, categorized by type of matter.
(2) Reports under this section may be altered to protect the privacy  of students and
university employees and to comply with the federal Family  Educational Rights and Privacy
Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g), the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, the
attorney-client privilege, or other state and federal confidentiality rules.
SECTION 2.
(1) A public  university listed in ORS 352.002 shall submit the first report
required under section 1 of this 2021 Act no later than January 2, 2022.
(2) No later than July 1, 2024, the Attorney General shall report  to an appropriate com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on:
(a) The use of outside counsel by public universities listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) A summary of the  process for use of outside counsel at public universities in other
states.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2214 (HB 2214-B) Page 1
Passed by House April 8, 2021
Repassed by House June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2214 (HB 2214-B) Page 2